District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Attorney General” means the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

(2)

“CMPA” means Chapter 6 of Title 1, [§ 1-601.01 et seq.].

(3)

“Department” means the Department of Health Care Finance established by § 7-771.02.

(4)

“Department CFO” means the Chief Financial Officer for the Department of Health Care Finance.

(5)

“District CFO” means the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia.

(6)

“DOH” means the Department of Health.

(7)

“MAA” means the Medical Assistance Administration.

(8)

“PPA” means Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2, [§ 2-301.01 et seq.)].

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 2, 55 DCR 216
Section 7090 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 13 of D.C. Law 17-109.